Massachusetts, session 194th, S2082.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of Chapter 64H of the general laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting, after the definition of “Retail establishment”,
the following new definition:-
“Rolling stock”, trucks, tractors, trailers, and railcars, used by common carriers to
transport goods in interstate commerce.
SECTION 2. Section 6 of Chapter 64H of the general laws, as so appearing, is hereby
further amended by inserting, after subsection (xx), the following new subsection:
“(yy) sales of rolling stock”
of 2

SECTION 3. Section 1 of Chapter 64I of the general laws, as so appearing, is amended
by inserting in line 8, after the words “ retail sale”, the following new words:- “rolling stock”, .
SECTION 4. Section 7 of chapter 64I of the general laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by inserting, after subsection (e), the following new subsection:-
“(f) storage, use or other consumption of rolling stock”.
of 2